Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB468.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 344.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Commission" means the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights;["Person"
includes one (1) or more individuals, labor organizations, joint apprenticeship
committees, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal representatives, mutual
companies, joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,
trustees in bankruptcy, fiduciaries, receivers, or other legal or commercial entity;
the state, any of its political or civil subdivisions or agencies.]
(2) "Commissioner" means a member of the commission;["Commission" means the
Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.]
(3) "Credit transaction" means any open-end or closed-end credit transaction,
whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment transaction, credit card issue or
charge, or otherwise, and whether for personal or for business purposes, in which
a service, finance, or interest charge is imposed, or which provides for repayment
in scheduled payments, when credit is extended in the regular course of business
of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by banks,
savings and loan associations, or other financial lending institutions of whatever
nature, by stock brokers, or by a merchant or mercantile establishment which as
part of its ordinary business permits or provides that payment for purchases of
property or services therefrom may be deferred;["Commissioner" means a member
of the commission.]
(4) (a) "Disability" means, with respect to an individual:
1. [(a)] A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one (1)
Page 2 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
or more of the major life activities of the individual;
2. [(b)] A record of such an impairment; or
3. [(c)] Being regarded as having such an impairment.
(b) "Disability" and "substantially limits" shall be interpreted in a manner
consistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act Amendments Act of
2008, Pub. L. No. 110-325, as amended;[
Persons with current or past controlled substances abuse or alcohol abuse problems
and persons excluded from coverage by the Americans with Disabilities Act of
1990 (P.L. 101-336) shall be excluded from this section.]
(5) "Discrimination" means any direct or indirect act or practice of exclusion,
distinction, restriction, segregation, limitation, refusal, denial, or any other act or
practice of differentiation or preference in the treatment of a person or persons, or
the aiding, abetting, inciting, coercing, or compelling thereof made unlawful under
this chapter;[.]
(6) "Discriminatory housing practice" means an act that is unlawful under KRS
344.360, 344.367, 344.370, 344.380, or 344.680;["Real property" includes
buildings, structures, real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, cooperatives,
condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest in the
above.]
(7) (a) "Familial status" means one (1) or more individuals who have not attained
the age of eighteen (18) and are domiciled with:
1. A parent or other person having legal custody of the individual or
individuals; or
2. The designee of a parent or other person having custody, with the
written permission of the parent or other person.
(b) The protection afforded against discrimination on the basis of familial
status shall apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of
Page 3 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of
eighteen (18);["Housing accommodations" includes improved and
unimproved property and means any building, structure, lot or portion thereof,
which is used or occupied, or is intended, arranged, or designed to be used or
occupied as the home or residence of one (1) or more families, and any vacant
land which is offered for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon
of any such building or structure.]
(8) "Family" includes a single individual;["Real estate operator" means any
individual or combination of individuals, labor organizations, joint apprenticeship
committees, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal representatives, mutual
companies, joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees in
bankruptcy, receivers, or other legal or commercial entity, the county, or any of its
agencies, that is engaged in the business of selling, purchasing, exchanging, renting,
or leasing real estate, or the improvements thereon, including options, or that
derives income, in whole or in part, from the sale, purchase, exchange, rental, or
lease of real estate; or an individual employed by or acting on behalf of any of
these.]
(9) "Financial institution" means a bank, banking organization, mortgage company,
insurance company, or other lender to whom application is made for financial
assistance for the purchase, lease, acquisition, construction, rehabilitation,
repair, maintenance, or improvement of real property, or an individual employed
by or acting on behalf of any of these;["Real estate broker" or "real estate
salesman" means any individual, whether licensed or not, who, on behalf of others,
for a fee, commission, salary, or other valuable consideration, or who with the
intention or expectation of receiving or collecting the same, lists, sells, purchases,
exchanges, rents, or leases real estate, or the improvements thereon, including
options, or who negotiates or attempts to negotiate on behalf of others such an
Page 4 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
activity; or who advertises or holds himself out as engaged in these activities; or
who negotiates or attempts to negotiate on behalf of others a loan secured by
mortgage or other encumbrance upon a transfer of real estate, or who is engaged in
the business of charging an advance fee or contracting for collection of a fee in
connection with a contract whereby he undertakes to promote the sale, purchase,
exchange, rental, or lease of real estate through its listing in a publication issued
primarily for this purpose; or any person employed by or acting on behalf of any of
these.]
(10) "Housing accommodations" includes improved and unimproved property and
means a building, structure, lot, or portion thereof, which is used or occupied, or
is intended, arranged, or designed to be used or occupied, as the home or
residence of one (1) or more families, and any vacant land which is offered for
sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any building or
structure;["Financial institution" means bank, banking organization, mortgage
company, insurance company, or other lender to whom application is made for
financial assistance for the purchase, lease, acquisition, construction, rehabilitation,
repair, maintenance, or improvement of real property, or an individual employed by
or acting on behalf of any of these.]
(11) "Licensing agency" means any public or private organization which has as one (1)
of its duties the issuing of licenses or the setting of standards which an individual
must hold or must meet as a condition to practicing a particular trade or profession
or to obtaining certain employment within the state or as a condition to competing
effectively with an individual who does hold a license or meet the standards;[.]
(12) "Major life activities":
(a) Includes but is not limited to caring for oneself, performing manual tasks,
seeing, hearing, eating, sleeping, walking, standing, lifting, bending,
speaking, breathing, learning, reading, concentrating, thinking,
Page 5 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
communicating, and working; and
(b) Includes the operation of a major bodily function, including but not limited
to function of the immune system, normal cell growth, digestive, bowel,
bladder, neurological, brain, respiratory, circulatory, endocrine, and
reproductive functions;["Credit transaction" shall mean any open or closed
end credit transaction whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment
transaction, credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for personal
or for business purposes, in which a service, finance, or interest charge is
imposed, or which provides for repayment in scheduled payments, when such
credit is extended in the course of the regular course of any trade or
commerce, including but not limited to transactions by banks, savings and
loan associations, or other financial lending institutions of whatever nature,
stock brokers, or by a merchant or mercantile establishment which as part of
its ordinary business permits or provides that payment for purchases of
property or services therefrom may be deferred.]
(13) "Person" includes one (1) or more individuals, labor organizations, joint
apprenticeship committees, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal
representatives, mutual companies, joint-stock companies, limited liability
companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy,
fiduciaries, receivers, or other legal or commercial entities, the Commonwealth,
or any of its political or civil subdivisions or agencies;["To rent" means to lease, to
sublease, to let, or otherwise to grant for a consideration the right to occupy
premises not owned by the occupant.]
(14) "Real estate broker" or "real estate salesperson" means any individual, whether
licensed or not, who:
(a) On behalf of others, for a fee, commission, salary, or other valuable
consideration, or who with the intention or expectation of receiving or
Page 6 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
collecting valuable consideration, lists, sells, purchases, exchanges, rents,
or leases real estate, or the improvements thereon, including options;
(b) Negotiates or attempts to negotiate on behalf of others:
1. An activity described in paragraph (a) of this subsection; or
2. A loan secured by a mortgage or other encumbrance upon a transfer
of real estate;
(c) Advertises or holds oneself out as engaged in an activity described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(d) Is engaged in the business of charging an advance fee or contracting for
collection of a fee in connection with a contract whereby the individual
undertakes to promote the sale, purchase, exchange, rental, or lease of real
estate through its listing in a publication issued primarily for this purpose;
or
(e) Is employed by or acting on behalf of any person described in paragraphs
(a) to (d) of this subsection;["Family" includes a single individual.]
(15) "Real estate operator" means:
(a) Any individual or combination of individuals, labor organizations, joint
apprenticeship committees, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal
representatives, mutual companies, joint stock companies, limited liability
companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees in bankruptcy,
receivers, or other legal or commercial entities, or a local government or
any of its agencies that:
1. Is engaged in the business of selling, purchasing, exchanging, renting,
or leasing real estate, or the improvements thereon, including options;
or
2. Derives income, in whole or in part, from the sale, purchase,
exchange, rental, or lease of real estate; or
Page 7 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
(b) An individual employed by or acting on behalf of any individual or entity
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;[(a) "Familial status" means
one (1) or more individuals who have not attained the age of eighteen (18)
years and are domiciled with:
1. A parent or another person having legal custody of the individual or
individuals; or
2. The designee of a parent or other person having custody, with the
written permission of the parent or other person.
(b) The protection afforded against discrimination on the basis of familial status
shall apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal
custody of any individual who has not attained the age of eighteen (18) years.]
(16) "Real property" includes buildings, structures, real estate, lands, tenements,
leaseholds, cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and
incorporeal, or any interest in those;["Discriminatory housing practice" means an
act that is unlawful under KRS 344.360, 344.367, 344.370, 344.380, or 344.680.]
(17) "Regarded as having such an impairment":
(a) Means an individual has established that he or she has been subjected to an
action prohibited under this chapter because of an actual or perceived
physical or mental impairment, whether or not the impairment limits or is
perceived to limit a major life activity; and
(b) Shall not apply to transitory and minor impairments;
(18) "To rent" means to lease, to sublease, to let, or otherwise to grant for a
consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by the occupant; and
(19) "Transitory impairment" means an impairment with an actual or expected
duration of six (6) months or less.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 344 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 8 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Ordinary eyeglasses or contact lenses" means lenses that are intended to
fully correct visual acuity or eliminate refractive error;
(b) "Low-vision devices" means devices that magnify, enhance, or otherwise
augment a visual image; and
(c) "Auxiliary aids and services" includes:
1. Qualified interpreters or other effective methods of making aurally
delivered materials available to individuals with hearing impairments;
2. Qualified readers, taped texts, or other effective methods of making
visually delivered materials available to individuals with visual
impairments;
3. Acquisition or modification of equipment or devices; and
4. Other similar services and actions.
(2) An impairment that substantially limits one (1) major life activity need not limit
other major life activities to be considered a disability.
(3) An impairment that is episodic or in remission is a disability if it would
substantially limit a major life activity when active.
(4) (a) The determination of whether an impairment substantially limits a major
life activity shall be made without regard to the ameliorative effects of
mitigating measures such as:
1. Medication, medical supplies, equipment, or appliances, low-vision
devices not including ordinary eyeglasses or contact lenses, prosthetics
including limbs and devices, hearing aids and cochlear implants or
other implantable hearing devices, mobility devices, or oxygen therapy
equipment and supplies;
2. Use of assistive technology;
3. Reasonable accommodations or auxiliary aids or services; or
Page 9 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
4. Learned behavioral or adaptive neurological modifications.
(b) The ameliorative effects of the mitigating measures of ordinary eyeglasses
or contact lenses shall be considered in determining whether an impairment
substantially limits a major life activity.
(5) An employer shall not be required to offer an accommodation to an employee
who is regarded as having such an impairment as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. KRS 344.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The general purposes of this chapter are:
(a) To provide for execution within the Commonwealth[state] of the policies
embodied in the [Federal ]Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352, as
amended[ (78 Stat. 241)], Title VIII of the [Federal ]Civil Rights Act of 1968,
Pub. L. No. 90-284, as amended[ (82 Stat. 81)], the Fair Housing Act, Pub.
L. No. 90-284, as amended[ (42 U.S.C. 360)], the [Federal ]Age
Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, Pub. L. No. 90-202, as
amended[ (81 Stat. 602)], the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, Pub.
L. No. [(P.L. ]101-336[)], as amended, [and ]the Civil Rights Act of 1991,
Pub. L. No. 102-166, as amended[ (P.L. 102-166, amended by P.L. 102-
392)], and the Americans with Disabilities Act Amendments Act of 2008,
Pub. L. No. 110-325, as amended;
(b) To safeguard all individuals within the Commonwealth[state] from
discrimination because of familial status, race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, age forty (40) and over, or because of the person's status as a qualified
individual with a disability as defined in KRS 344.010 and KRS 344.030;
thereby to protect their interest in personal dignity and freedom from
humiliation, to make available to the Commonwealth[state] their full
productive capacities, to secure the Commonwealth[state] against domestic
strife and unrest which would menace its democratic institutions, to preserve
Page 10 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
the public safety, health, and general welfare, and to further the interest,
rights, and privileges of individuals within the Commonwealth[state]; and
(c) To establish as the policy of the Commonwealth the safeguarding of the rights
of an individual selling or leasing his or her primary residence through private
sale without the aid of any real estate operator, broker, or
salesperson[salesman] and without advertising or public display.
(2) This chapter shall be construed to further the general purposes stated in this section
and the special purposes of the particular provision involved.
(3) [Nothing in ]This chapter shall not be construed as indicating an intent to exclude
local laws on the same subject matter not inconsistent with this chapter.
(4) [Nothing contained in ]This chapter shall not be deemed to repeal any other law of
this Commonwealth[state] relating to discrimination because of familial status,
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age forty (40) and over, or because of the
person's status as a qualified individual with a disability as defined in KRS 344.030.
Section 4. KRS 344.030 is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of KRS 344.030 to 344.110:
(1) (a) "Qualified individual with a disability":
1. Means an individual with a disability as defined in KRS 344.010 who,
with or without reasonable accommodation, can perform the essential
functions of the employment position that the individual holds or desires
unless an employer demonstrates that he or she is unable to reasonably
accommodate an employee's or prospective employee's disability
without undue hardship on the conduct of the employers' business; and
2. Shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with the Americans with
Disabilities Act Amendments Act of 2008, Pub. L. No. 110-325, as
amended; and[.]
(b) Consideration shall be given to the employer's judgment as to what functions
Page 11 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
of a job are essential, and if an employer has prepared a written description
before advertising or interviewing applicants for the job, this description shall
be considered evidence of the essential functions of the job;
(2) (a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, "employer"
means a person who has eight (8) or more employees within the
Commonwealth[state] in each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the
current or preceding calendar year and an agent of such a person;[, except ]
(b) For purposes of determining accommodations for an employee's own
limitations related to her pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions,
"employer" means a person who has fifteen (15) or more employees within
the Commonwealth[state] in each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in
the current or preceding calendar year and any agent of the person; and[, and,
except ]
(c) For purposes of determining discrimination based on disability, "employer":
1. Means a person engaged in an industry affecting commerce who has
fifteen (15) or more employees for each working day in each of twenty
(20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year,
and any agent of that person; and[, except that, for two (2) years
following July 14, 1992, an employer means a person engaged in an
industry affecting commerce who has twenty-five (25) or more
employees for each working day in each of twenty (20) or more calendar
weeks in the current or preceding year, and any agent of that person. For
the purposes of determining discrimination based on disability,
employer ]
2. Shall not include:
a.[(a)] The United States, a corporation wholly owned by the
government of the United States, or an Indian tribe; or
Page 12 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
b.[(b)] A bona fide private membership club (other than a labor
organization) that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c) of
the Internal Revenue Service Code of 1986;
(3) "Employment agency" means a person regularly undertaking with or without
compensation to procure employees for an employer or to procure for employees
opportunities to work for an employer and includes an agent of the[such] person;
(4) "Labor organization" means a labor organization and an agent of a labor[such an]
organization, and includes:
(a) An organization of any kind, an agency or employee representation
committee, group, association, or plan [so engaged ]in which employees
participate and which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing
with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay,
hours, or other terms or conditions of employment;[,] and
(b) A conference, general committee, joint or system board, or joint council [so
engaged which is ]subordinate to a national or international labor
organization;
(5) (a) "Employee" means an individual employed by an employer, but does not
include an individual employed by his or her parents, spouse, or child, or an
individual employed to render services as a domestic in the home of the
employer;[.]
(b) Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United
States Department of Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee nor a
franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisor for
any purpose under this chapter;[.]
(c) Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United
States Department of Labor and a franchisor, neither a franchisor nor a
franchisor's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisee for
Page 13 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
any purpose under this chapter; and[.]
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "franchisee" and "franchisor" have the same
meanings as in 16 C.F.R. sec. 436.1;
(6) "Reasonable accommodation":
(a) Means making existing facilities used by employees readily accessible to and
usable by individuals with disabilities, job restructuring, part-time or modified
work schedules, reassignment to a vacant position, acquisition or modification
of equipment or devices, appropriate adjustment or modifications of
examinations, training materials or policies, the provision of qualified readers
or interpreters, and other similar accommodations for individuals with
disabilities; and
(b) For an employee's own limitations related to her pregnancy, childbirth, or
related medical conditions, may include more frequent or longer breaks, time
off to recover from childbirth, acquisition or modification of equipment,
appropriate seating, temporary transfer to a less strenuous or less hazardous
position, job restructuring, light duty, modified work schedule, and private
space that is not a bathroom for expressing breast milk;
(7) "Religion" means all aspects of religious observance and practice, as well as belief,
unless an employer demonstrates that he or she is unable to reasonably
accommodate to an employee's or prospective employee's religious observance or
practice without undue hardship on the conduct of the employer's business;
(8) (a) The terms "because of sex" and "on the basis of sex" include but are not
limited to because of or on the basis of pregnancy, childbirth, or related
medical conditions, and women affected by pregnancy, childbirth, or related
medical conditions shall be treated the same for all employment-related
purposes, including receipt of benefits under fringe benefit programs, as other
persons not so affected but similar in their ability or inability to work.
Page 14 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
(b) "Related medical condition" includes but is not limited to lactation or the need
to express breast milk for a nursing child and has the same meaning as in the
Pregnancy Discrimination Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 2000e(k), and shall be
construed as that term has been construed under that Act; and
(9) "Undue hardship," for purposes of disability discrimination or limitations due to
pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions as described in KRS
344.040(1)(c), means an action requiring significant difficulty or expense, when
considered in light of the following factors:
(a) The nature and cost of the accommodation needed;
(b) The overall financial resources of the facility or facilities involved in the
provision of the reasonable accommodation; the number of persons employed
at the facility; the effect on expenses and resources; or the impact otherwise of
the[such] accommodation upon the operation of the facility;
(c) The overall financial resources of the covered entity; the overall size of the
business of a covered entity with respect to the number of its employees; and
the number, type, and location of its facilities;
(d) The type of operation or operations of the covered entity, including the
composition, structure, and functions of the workforce of such entity; the
geographic separateness, administrative, or fiscal relationship of the facility or
facilities in question to the covered entity; and
(e) In addition to paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection, for pregnancy,
childbirth, and related medical conditions, the following factors:
1. The duration of the requested accommodation; and
2. Whether similar accommodations are required by policy to be made,
have been made, or are being made for other employees for[due to] any
reason.
Section 5. KRS 344.190 is amended to read as follows:
Page 15 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
In the enforcement of this chapter, the commission [on Human Rights ]shall have the
following powers and duties:
(1) To maintain an office in the city of Louisville and other offices within the
Commonwealth[state] as may be deemed necessary;[.]
(2) To meet and exercise its powers at any place within the Commonwealth;[.]
(3) Within the limitations provided by law, to appoint an executive director, attorneys,
hearing examiners, clerks, and other employees and agents as it may deem
necessary. At the direction of the commission, attorneys appointed under this
section may appear for and represent the commission in any court. The commission
may, by written order, delegate the authority given by this subsection to its
executive director, except as that authority relates to the appointment of its
executive director;[.]
(4) To promote the creation of local commissions on human rights, to cooperate with
state, local, and other agencies, both public and private, and individuals, and to
obtain upon request and utilize the services of all governmental departments and
agencies;[.]
(5) To cooperate with the [United States ]Equal Employment Opportunity Commission,
created by [Section 705 of ]the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352[ (78
Stat. 241)], [in order to achieve the purposes of that act, ]and with other federal and
local agencies in order to achieve the purposes of that act, and with other federal
and local agencies in order to achieve the purposes of this chapter;[.]
(6) To accept gifts or bequests, grants, or other payments, public or private, to help
finance its activities;[.]
(7) To accept reimbursement pursuant to Section 709(b) of the Civil Rights Act of
1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352 [(78 Stat. 241) ]for services rendered to assist the
[Federal ]Equal Employment Opportunity Commission;[.]
(8) To receive, initiate, investigate, and seek to conciliate[, hold hearings on, and pass
Page 16 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
upon] complaints alleging violations of this chapter;[.]
(9) To seek relief against unlawful practices in employment and public
accommodations as provided in Section 6 of this Act;
(10) To exercise the powers conferred in KRS 344.600 to 344.680 with respect to
unlawful practices in housing;
(11)[(9)] At any time after a complaint is filed, to require answers to interrogatories,
compel the attendance of witnesses, examine witnesses under oath or affirmation in
person or by deposition, and require the production of documents relevant to the
complaint. The commission may make rules authorizing any member or individual
designated to exercise these powers in the performance of official duties;[.]
(12)[(10)] To furnish technical assistance requested by persons subject to this chapter to
further their compliance with this chapter or an order issued thereunder;[.]
(13)[(11)] To make studies appropriate to effectuate the purposes and policies of this
chapter and to make the results thereof available to the public;[.]
(14)[(12)] To render annual written reports to the Governor and the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on
Judiciary[Legislature]. The reports may contain recommendations of the
commission for legislative or other action to effectuate the purposes and policies of
this chapter;[.]
(15)[(13)] To create local or statewide advisory agencies that in its judgment will aid in
effectuating the purpose of this chapter. The commission may empower these
agencies:
(a) To study and report on problems of discrimination because of familial status,
race, color, religion, [or ]national origin, sex, age forty (40) and over, or a
person's status as a qualified individual with a disability;[,]
(b) To foster, through community effort or otherwise, goodwill among the groups
and elements of the population of the Commonwealth;[state,] and
Page 17 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
(c) To make recommendations to the commission for the development of policies
and practices that will aid in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.
Members of those agencies[such committees] shall serve without pay but
shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in [such ]service. The commission
may make provision for technical and clerical assistance to the
agencies;[committees.]
(16)[(14)] To [adopt, ]promulgate[, amend, and rescind] administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to effectuate the purposes and provisions of
this chapter, including regulations requiring the posting of notices prepared or
approved by the commission; and[.]
(17)[(15)] To purchase liability insurance for the protection of all members of the
commission to protect them from liability arising in the course of pursuing their
duties as members of the commission and for all full-time employees to protect
them from liability arising in the course or scope of their employment. This
insurance shall be purchased with money contained in the agency's[agency]
appropriated budget.
Section 6. KRS 344.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) An individual claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful practice other than a
discriminatory housing practice, a member of the commission, or the Attorney
General may file with the commission a written sworn complaint stating that
an unlawful practice has been committed, setting forth the facts upon which
the complaint is based, and setting forth facts sufficient to enable the
commission to identify the [persons charged ( referred to as the ]respondent[
in this section, KRS 344.210, 344.230, and 344.240)]. The commission shall
make reasonable accommodations to assist persons with disabilities in filing a
written sworn complaint. The commission staff or a person designated
pursuant to its administrative regulations shall promptly investigate the
Page 18 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
allegations of unlawful practice set forth in the complaint and shall within five
(5) days furnish the respondent with a copy of the complaint. The complaint
must be filed within one hundred eighty (180) days after the alleged unlawful
practice occurs.
(b) An individual claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful practice other than a
discriminatory housing practice may file a civil cause of action in Circuit
Court pursuant to KRS 344.450 without first filing a complaint with the
commission.
(2) (a) 1. The commission or an individual designated pursuant to its
administrative regulations shall:
a. Allow a respondent at least twenty (20) days to file a written
response to the complaint; and
b. Determine [within thirty (30) days after the complaint has been
filed ]whether there is probable cause to believe the respondent has
engaged in an unlawful practice.
2. a. If the commission determines that there is probable cause to
believe that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice,
the commission may file an action in Circuit Court in
accordance with subsection (6)(a) of this section no later than
one hundred eighty (180) days after its receipt of the complaint.
b. If the commission declines or fails to file an action under
subdivision a. of this subparagraph, the commission shall issue a
notice dismissing the complaint without prejudice and furnish
copies to the complainant and the respondent.
3. If the commission determines[it is determined] that there is no probable
cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice,
the commission shall issue an order dismissing the complaint without
Page 19 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
prejudice and [shall ]furnish a copy of the order to the complainant[,]
and the respondent[, the Attorney General, and any other public officers
and persons that the commission deems proper].
4. If the commission is unable to determine within one hundred eighty
(180) days of its receipt of a complaint whether there is probable cause
to believe the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice, the
commission shall issue a notice dismissing the complaint without
prejudice and furnish copies to the complainant and the respondent.
(b) An individual claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful practice other than a
discriminatory housing practice may file a civil cause of action in Circuit
Court pursuant to KRS 344.450 asserting a claim arising from the same
facts or circumstances while the complaint is pending before the
commission or after its dismissal by the commission.
(3) Neither the filing of the complaint with the commission nor its investigation by or
pendency before the commission shall operate to toll or suspend the running of a
statute of limitations under KRS 413.115 or any other statute[The complainant,
within ten (10) days after receiving a copy of the order dismissing the complaint,
may file with the commission an application for reconsideration of the order. Upon
receiving a reconsideration application, the commission or an individual designated
pursuant to administrative regulation shall make a new determination within ten
(10) days whether there is probable cause to believe that the respondent has
engaged in an unlawful practice. If it is determined that there is no probable cause
to believe that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice, the commission
shall issue an order dismissing the complaint and furnishing a copy of the order to
the complainant, the respondent, the Attorney General, and any other public officers
and persons that the commission deems proper].
(4) (a) If the commission[staff] determines[,] after investigation[, or if the
Page 20 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
commission determines after the review provided for in subsection (3) of this
section] that there is probable cause to believe that the respondent has
engaged in an unlawful practice, the commission [staff ]shall endeavor to
eliminate the alleged unlawful practice by conference, conciliation, and
persuasion.
(b) The terms of a conciliation agreement reached with a respondent may require
him or her to refrain from the commission of unlawful discriminatory
practices in the future and make any further provisions as may be agreed upon
between the commission or its staff and the respondent.
(c) If a conciliation agreement is entered into, the commission shall issue and
serve on the complainant an order stating its terms. A copy of the order shall
be delivered to the respondent[, the Attorney General, and any other public
officers and persons that the commission deems proper].
(d) Except for the terms of the conciliation agreement, neither the commission
nor any officer or employee thereof shall make public, without the written
consent of the complainant and the respondent, information concerning efforts
in a particular case to eliminate an unlawful practice by conference,
conciliation, or persuasion whether or not there is a determination of probable
cause or a conciliation agreement.
(5) At the expiration of one (1) year from the date of a conciliation agreement, and at
other times in its reasonable discretion, the commission staff may investigate
whether the terms of the agreement have been and are being complied with by the
respondent. Upon a finding that the terms of the agreement are not being complied
with by the respondent, the commission shall take whatever action it deems
appropriate to assure compliance.
(6) (a) 1. Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after its receipt of the
complaint[At any time after a complaint is filed], the commission may
Page 21 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
file an action in the Circuit Court in a county in which the subject of the
complaint occurs, or in a county in which a respondent resides or has his
or her principal place of business, seeking appropriate [temporary ]relief
against the respondent on behalf of a private party who has not
previously filed a civil cause of action for the same grievance[,
pending final determination of proceedings including an order or decree
restraining him from doing or procuring any act tending to render
ineffectual any order the commission may enter with respect to the
complaint. The court shall have power to grant temporary relief or a
restraining order as it deems just and proper].
2. The commission may request appropriate relief for the aggrieved
private party on whose behalf the action was filed, not to exceed the
remedies in KRS 344.450.
3. A jury shall decide all matters triable by jury at common law,
including without limitation questions of fact, questions of liability,
and monetary damages.
4. An action filed under this paragraph shall be subject to the statute of
limitations in KRS 413.115.
(b) The commission's filing of an action under paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall prevent the aggrieved private party from filing a civil cause of action
pursuant to KRS 344.450 arising from the same facts or circumstances. The
aggrieved private party may, however, intervene in the action filed by the
commission.
(c) The court shall dismiss a civil action filed by the commission if the
aggrieved individual previously filed an action arising from the same set of
facts or circumstances pursuant to KRS 344.450. The commission may
intervene in the previously filed action provided the plaintiff consents in
Page 22 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
writing to the intervention.
(d) In any civil action filed under this section, the commission may request
appropriate relief for the aggrieved private party on whose behalf the action
was filed, not to exceed the remedies in KRS 344.450.
(e) A jury shall decide all matters triable by jury at common law, including
without limitation questions of fact, questions of liability, and monetary
damages.
(7) Notwithstanding KRS 413.115, subsection (6) of this section, or any other law to
the contrary, a private party:
(a) Who claims to be aggrieved by a practice that is unlawful under this
chapter, other than a discriminatory housing practice;
(b) Who timely filed his or her complaint with the commission prior to the
effective date of this Act; and
(c) Whose written complaint remained pending before the commission on the
effective date of this Act;
may file a civil cause of action in Circuit Court pursuant to KRS 344.450 not
later than one (1) year after the effective date of this Act. The filing of such an
action shall be deemed timely and shall not be barred by a statute of limitations
that would otherwise apply.
(8) [Nothing in ]This section shall not apply to any discriminatory housing practice.
Section 7. KRS 344.320 is amended to read as follows:
A local commission may be authorized to:
(1) Receive, initiate, and investigate[, hear, and determine] charges of violations of
ordinances, orders, or resolutions forbidding discrimination adopted by the city or
county;[.]
(2) Compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence before it by
subpoena issued by the Circuit Court of the county wherein the local commission is
Page 23 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
authorized to act;[.]
(3) [Issue remedial orders, after notice and hearing, requiring cessation of violations.
(4) Issue such affirmative orders as in the judgment of the local commission will carry
out the purposes of this chapter. Affirmative action ordered may include but is not
limited to the remedies enumerated in subsection (3) of KRS 344.230.
(5) ]Employ an executive director, attorneys, [hearing examiners, clerks ]and other
employees and agents; and[.]
(4)[(6)] Accept grants, gifts, or bequests, public or private, to help finance its
activities.
SECTION 8. KRS 344.340 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) An individual claiming to be aggrieved by a practice made unlawful by a
city or county under KRS 344.300 may file with a local commission a
written sworn complaint stating that an unlawful practice has been
committed, setting forth the facts upon which the complaint is based, and
setting forth facts sufficient to enable the local commission to identify the
respondent. The local commission shall make reasonable accommodations
to assist persons with disabilities in filing a written sworn complaint. The
local commission shall promptly investigate the allegations of unlawful
practice set forth in the complaint and shall within five (5) days furnish the
respondent with a copy of the complaint. The complaint shall be filed within
one hundred eighty (180) days after the alleged unlawful practice occurs.
(b) An individual claiming to be aggrieved by a practice made unlawful by a
city or county under KRS 344.300 may file a civil cause of action in Circuit
Court pursuant to KRS 344.450 without first filing a complaint with a local
commission.
(2) (a) 1. The local commission shall:
Page 24 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
a. Allow a respondent at least twenty (20) days to file a written
response to the complaint; and
b. Determine whether there is probable cause to believe the
respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice.
2. a. If the local commission determines that there is probable cause
to believe that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful
practice, the local commission may file an action in Circuit
Court in accordance with subsection (6)(a) of this section no
later than one hundred eighty (180) days after its receipt of the
complaint.
b. If the local commission declines or fails to file an action under
subdivision a. of this subparagraph, the local commission shall
issue a notice dismissing the complaint without prejudice and
furnish copies to the complainant and the respondent.
3. If the local commission determines that there is no probable cause to
believe that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice, the
local commission shall issue an order dismissing the complaint
without prejudice and furnish a copy of the order to the complainant
and the respondent.
4. If the local commission is unable to determine within one hundred
eighty (180) days of its receipt of a complaint whether there is
probable cause to believe the respondent has engaged in an unlawful
practice, the local commission shall issue a notice dismissing the
complaint without prejudice and furnish copies to the complainant
and the respondent.
(b) An individual claiming to be aggrieved by a practice made unlawful by a
city or county under KRS 344.300 may file a civil cause of action in Circuit
Page 25 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
Court pursuant to KRS 344.450 asserting a claim arising from the same
facts or circumstances while the complaint is pending before the local
commission or after its dismissal by the local commission.
(3) Neither the filing of the complaint with a local commission nor its investigation
by or pendency before a local commission shall operate to toll or suspend the
running of a statute of limitations under KRS 413.115 or any other statute.
(4) (a) If the local commission determines after investigation that there is probable
cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice,
the local commission may endeavor to eliminate the alleged unlawful
practice by conference, conciliation, and persuasion.
(b) The terms of a conciliation agreement reached with a respondent may
require him or her to refrain from engaging in unlawful discriminatory
practices in the future and make any further provisions as may be agreed
upon between the local commission or its staff and the respondent.
(c) If a conciliation agreement is entered into, the local commission shall issue
and serve on the complainant an order stating its terms. A copy of the order
shall be delivered to the respondent.
(d) Except for the terms of the conciliation agreement, neither the local
commission nor any of its officers or employees shall make public, without
the written consent of the complainant and the respondent, information
concerning efforts in a particular case to eliminate an unlawful practice by
conference, conciliation, or persuasion, whether or not the complaint
results in a determination of probable cause or a conciliation agreement.
(5) At the expiration of one (1) year from the date of a conciliation agreement, and at
other times in its reasonable discretion, the local commission staff may
investigate whether the terms of the agreement have been and are being complied
with by the respondent. Upon a finding that the terms of the agreement are not
Page 26 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
being complied with by the respondent, the local commission shall take whatever
action it deems appropriate to assure compliance.
(6) (a) 1. Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after its receipt of the
complaint, the local commission may file an action in Circuit Court
seeking appropriate relief against the respondent on behalf of a
private party who has not previously filed a civil cause of action for
the same grievance.
2. The local commission may request appropriate relief for the aggrieved
private party on whose behalf the action was filed, not to exceed the
remedies in KRS 344.450.
3. A jury shall decide all matters triable by jury at common law,
including without limitation questions of fact, questions of liability,
and monetary damages.
4. An action filed under this paragraph shall be subject to the statute of
limitations in KRS 413.115.
(b) A local commission's filing of an action under paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall prevent the aggrieved private party from filing a civil cause
of action pursuant to KRS 344.450 arising from the same facts or
circumstances. The aggrieved private party may, however, intervene in the
action filed by the local commission.
(c) The court shall dismiss a civil action filed by a local commission if the
aggrieved private party previously filed an action arising from the same set
of facts or circumstances pursuant to KRS 344.450. The local commission
may intervene in the previously filed action if the plaintiff consents in
writing to the intervention.
(7) Notwithstanding KRS 413.115, subsection (6) of this section, or any other law to
the contrary, a private party:
Page 27 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
(a) Who claims to be aggrieved by a practice that is made unlawful by a city or
county under KRS 344.300;
(b) Who timely filed his or her complaint with the local commission prior to the
effective date of this Act; and
(c) Whose written complaint remained pending before the local commission on
the effective date of this Act;
may file a civil cause of action in Circuit Court pursuant to KRS 344.450 not
later than one (1) year after the effective date of this Act. The filing of the action
shall be deemed timely and shall not be barred by a statute of limitations that
would otherwise apply.
Section 9. KRS 344.635 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a discriminatory housing charge is filed under KRS 344.625, a complainant,
a respondent, or the aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaint is filed[,]
may:
(a) Elect to have the claims asserted in that charge decided in a civil action under
KRS 344.670[,] in lieu of an administrative hearing before the commission
under KRS 344.640; and
(b) Demand a trial by jury if the civil action is elected.
(2)[(1)] The election shall be made not later than twenty (20) days after the receipt by
the electing person of service under KRS 344.630[, from the commission or, in the
case of the commission, not later than twenty (20) days after service to the
respondent and complainant].
(3)[(2)] The person making the election shall give written notice of the election[doing
so] to the commission[ and to all other complainants and respondents to whom the
charge relates].
Section 10. KRS 344.660 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In a civil action under KRS 344.650, if the Circuit Court finds that a discriminatory
Page 28 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, the Circuit Court may award to
the plaintiff actual and punitive damages, and subject to subsection (3) of this
section, may grant other[as] relief[,] as the court deems appropriate, including:
(a) The issuance of any:
1. Permanent or temporary injunction;[,]
2. Restraining order;[, or ]
3. Other order, including an order enjoining the defendant from engaging
in the discriminatory practice; or
(b) Ordering affirmative action as appropriate.
(2) In a civil action under KRS [344.240, ]344.650[,] or 344.665, the court[,] in its
discretion[,] may award the prevailing complainant[,] a reasonable
attorney's[attorneys'] fee and costs. The court[,] in its discretion[,] may award the
prevailing respondent a reasonable attorney's[attorneys'] fee and costs if the
respondent establishes that the complaint upon which the action was based was
brought in bad faith. Whether a party has committed bad faith shall be determined
in accordance with Rule 11 of the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure. The
Commonwealth[state] shall not be liable in any event for fees and costs.
(3) [However, no ]Relief provided under this section shall not affect[effect] any
contract, sale, encumbrance, or lease:
(a) Consummated before the granting of that relief;[,] and
(b) Involving a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or tenant;[,]
without actual notice of either the filing of the complaint of a discriminatory
housing practice complaint with the commission or the filing of a civil action.
Section 11. KRS 344.675 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In any administrative proceeding brought under KRS 344.640 or 344.645 or any
court proceeding arising therefrom, [including actions described in KRS 344.240 or
any civil action, ]the commission or the court, as the case may be, upon application
Page 29 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 468/GA
of either party[,] and in its discretion, may:
(a) Appoint an attorney for the person; or
(b) Award a reasonable attorney's[attorneys'] fee and costs to the prevailing party
to the same extent allowed in KRS 344.660, or both. The
Commonwealth[state] shall not be liable in any event for fees and costs.
(2) The Commonwealth[state] through the commission's attorney or the Attorney
General shall maintain any civil action on behalf of the complainant or aggrieved
party.
(3) Where the parties to an alleged discriminatory housing practice have elected an
administrative determination rather than a civil adjudication, the commission staff
attorney shall represent the complainant or aggrieved party before the commission.
Section 12. The following KRS sections are repealed:
344.210 Notice of complaint -- Hearing procedures.
344.230 Orders of commission -- Nature of affirmative action.
344.240 Scope of and procedure for judicial review --Hearing -- Appeal.
344.270 Commission or court not to take jurisdiction over claim for unlawful practice
while claim pending before the other body -- Final determination exclusive.
Page 30 of 30
HB046810.100 - 1595 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:35 PM GA